Rhode Island statutes. Title 13 Criminals — Correctional Institutions
Chapter 7 Prisoner Made Goods

13-7-1.
Short title and purpose of chapter.

This chapter shall be known as “An Act to Promote the State Use System of Industries in the Public Welfare Institutions”, and shall be interpreted to encourage the production of goods and merchandise in the public welfare institutions of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-1

.

13-7-2.
“Public welfare institutions” defined.

“Public welfare institutions” as used in this chapter means the adult correctional institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-2

.

13-7-3.
Vocational training opportunities — Production of goods or services.

The director of the department of corrections may establish within any of the institutions under his or her control vocational training programs, and programs for the actual manufacture, assembly, repair, fabrication, servicing, and production of commercially saleable commodities and services.

The director or his or her designee may permit private persons, firms, or corporations, to establish and maintain the training and production activities within any of the institutions under his or her management and control, upon any terms and conditions that the director shall approve.

In respect to the actual production of goods or services, as distinct from training programs, the director or his or her designee shall cause the inmates who participate in those programs to be paid by any private person, firm, or corporation, the minimum wage then and there prevailing in this state, and shall attempt, so far as may be feasible and practicable, to cause the inmates to be paid the prevailing wage for similar types of work currently obtained within the state.

The director or his or her designee is authorized, if he or she deems it necessary, to waive workers’ compensation coverage, temporary disability insurance coverage, and other types of fringe benefits in respect to inmates who participate in these programs.

No inmate shall be required to participate in any program without his or her consent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 95, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 4.

13-7-4.
Imported goods.

The provisions of this chapter, and all other regulations and laws of this state not inconsistent with this chapter, shall apply to all goods, wares, and merchandise manufactured or mined, wholly or in part, by convicts or prisoners (except prisoners on parole or probation), or manufactured or mined in any penal or reformatory institution, and transported into the state for use or distribution, to the same extent and in the same manner as if those goods and merchandise were manufactured, produced, or mined within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-4

.

13-7-5.
Repealed.

13-7-6.
Sale of goods and performance of services — Public agencies.

For the purpose of this chapter, the provisions of §

13-7-3

shall not include:

The sale or exchange of convict-made goods produced in the public welfare institutions of this state, to or with other reformatory or custodial institutions, for their own consumption or use;

The sale of goods, wares, and merchandise to any department, institution, or agency of any state or its political subdivisions; nor

The performing of laundry services for other state institutions and agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-6

; P.L. 1961, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 24, § 4.

13-7-7.
Notice to public purchasing agents of articles being produced.

The department of corrections shall cause any articles and materials that are used in the offices, departments, or institutions of the state and of the several cities and towns to be produced by the labor of inmates in the public welfare institutions.

From time to time the department of corrections shall notify the state purchasing agent, and the managing officer of any office, department, or institution having the duty of purchasing articles and materials for any city or town, what articles and materials are being produced in the public welfare institutions. This notification shall describe the articles and materials in detail, giving the style, size, design, or quality and any other information necessary to properly describe the articles and materials.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-7

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 8.

13-7-8.
Requisition of goods by public agencies.

When the state purchasing agent or agent of any state office, department, or institution has occasion to purchase any articles, services or materials similar to those produced in the adult correctional institutions, and notification of that production has been given to him or her pursuant to §

13-7-7

, he or she shall make requisition for the articles, services or materials to the director of corrections, the provisions of any statute, resolution, rule, or regulation to the contrary notwithstanding. The requisition shall conform to specifications and descriptions previously submitted by the director unless it appears that special style, design, or quality is needed. The requisition shall be on forms provided by the director. If the articles or materials are needed immediately and are not on hand, or the articles, services, or materials can be purchased at a price less than the quote received by the requisitioner from the adult correctional institutions, the director shall immediately notify the requisitioner and he or she may purchase the articles, services or materials elsewhere.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-8

; P.L. 1995, ch. 295, § 1.

13-7-8.1.
Requisition of goods by cities and towns.

When the purchasing agent or the managing officer of any city or town office, department, or institution, has occasion to purchase any articles, services or materials similar to those produced at the adult correctional institutions, he or she shall notify the director of corrections of the intention to purchase and shall allow the adult correctional institutions to bid on any proposal. The adult correctional institutions shall be placed on any invitation to bid list which is in effect for any city or town. Purchases under this section shall include those defined in §

37-2-22

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 295, § 2.

13-7-9.
Repealed.

13-7-10.
Price of goods.

The price of all articles and materials supplied by the public welfare institutions shall conform as nearly as practicable to the wholesale market rates for similar goods manufactured elsewhere. Any difference of opinion in regard to price shall be submitted for arbitration to a representative of the department of corrections, a representative of the requisitioner, and the director of administration, and the decision of a majority of them shall be final.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-10

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 8.

13-7-11.
Standards and purchase agreements.

The director of corrections or his or her designee shall, from time to time, meet with the state purchasing agent to develop standards for commodities manufactured and produced by penal industries, and to prepare and secure compacts or agreements for the purchase of commodities from the penal institutions, so as to aid the service afforded by the institutions under the department of corrections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-11

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 8; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 4.

13-7-12.
Production standards — Determination of articles to be produced.

The director of corrections or his or her designee shall establish certain standards of production, and shall by consultation and meeting with the state purchasing agent and the managing officers and purchasing agents of municipal offices, departments, and institutions determine the style, design, and quality of articles and materials to be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-12

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 8; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 4.

13-7-13.
Manufacture on special order.

If articles or materials of a different design, style, or quality than those produced are needed by any state department or institution, the director of corrections may, if a sufficient quantity is needed, arrange for their manufacture of them on special order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-13

.

13-7-14.
Penalty for violations.

Any officer who willfully neglects or refuses to comply with the provisions of this chapter relative to the purchase of articles and materials from the public welfare institutions shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2106, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 64, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

13-7-14

.

13-7-15.
Business operations and budget.

Correctional industries shall maintain an accurate and timely accounting of monies received from the sale of products or services of committed offenders. Monies accredited into the correctional industries fund shall be used for the purchase of materials, supervision, and other requirements necessary to support the production of goods and services. All expenditures from the correctional industry fund shall be subject to the approval of the director of corrections or his or her designee, who may employ those funds to defray all operating expenses. All net profits for the fiscal year shall be reinvested into the correctional industries fund to support capital purchases, and the general expansion and development of correctional industries. All additional profits will revert to the general treasury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. XXIII, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 10, § 1.